Hawaii statutes.
[§321C-5] Public meetings and public
hearings. (a) State agencies to which this chapter applies shall not be
required to translate meeting notices, agendas, or minutes.

(b) Subject to section 321C-3, oral language
services for public meetings or public hearings held by the legislature shall
be provided if requested at least forty-eight hours in advance of the meeting
or hearing. When the notice of any public meeting or public hearing is posted
less than forty-eight hours in advance of the meeting or hearing, oral language
services shall be provided if requested at least twenty-four hours in advance
of the meeting or hearing. [L 2012, c 201, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next